Hawaii statutes.
[§334‑102] Criteria. The
director shall use the following as criteria in determining the eligibility of
each applicant:

(1) Facilities:

(A) Settings, whether residential or day,
shall be as close to a normal home environment as possible without sacrificing
client safety or care;

(B) Residential treatment centers shall be
relatively small, preferably fifteen beds or less, but in any case with the
appearance of noninstitutional setting; and

(C) The individual elements of the system,
where possible, shall be in separate facilities and not part of one large
facility attempting to serve an entire range of clients;

(2) Staffing patterns:

(A) Staffing patterns shall reflect, to the
maximum extent feasible, at all levels, the cultural, linguistic, ethnic,
sexual, and other social characteristics of the community the facility serves;

(B) The programs shall be designed to use
appropriate multidisciplinary professional consultation and staff to meet the
specific diagnostic and treatment needs of the client; and

(C) Programs shall be encouraged to use
paraprofessionals where appropriate;

(3) Programs:

(A) The programs shall have a rehabilitation
focus which encourages the client to develop the skills to become
self-sufficient and capable of increasing levels of independent functioning
where appropriate. They shall include prevocational and vocational programs;

(B) The programs shall encourage the
participation of the clients in the daily operation of the setting in
development of treatment and rehabilitation planning and evaluation;

(C) Participation in any element of the
system shall not preclude the involvement of clients in individual therapy.
Individual therapists of clients, where possible, shall be directly involved in
the development and implementation of a treatment plan;

(4) Coordination: The programs shall demonstrate
specific linkages with one another, and with the general treatment and social
service system, as a whole. These connections should not be limited to the
mental health system, but shall include, whenever possible, community resources
utilized by the general population. To ensure coordination occurs, each
program shall include a case management system in which the case manager serves
as a coordinator to assure the cooperative operation of the various elements of
the system and to act as an active advocate for the clients in the system. The
case manager shall assure that each client receives the appropriate type of
service. The case manager shall meet regularly with clients, work closely with
program staff, and serve as an advocate. The case manager shall work directly
with the client and the system to assure continuity of care between the service
elements of the system. [L 1980, c 221, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next